Utah statutes.
63J-4a-204.   Selection and review of claims.

(1)  On an annual basis, the office shall select and review a representative sample of claims submitted for reimbursement under the state Medicaid program to determine whether fraud, waste, or abuse occurred.

(2)  The office may directly contact the recipient of record for a Medicaid reimbursed service to determine whether the service for which reimbursement was claimed was actually provided to the recipient of record.

(3)  The office shall generate statistics from the sample described in Subsection (1) to determine the type of fraud, waste, or abuse that is most advantageous to focus on in future audits or investigations.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

